Hawaii statutes.
§21-1 Purpose. The purpose of this
chapter is to establish procedures governing legislative investigating
committees to provide for the creation and operation of legislative
investigating committees in a manner which will enable them to perform properly
the powers and duties vested in them, including the conduct of hearings, in a
fair and impartial manner, consistent with protection of the constitutional
rights of persons called to testify at such hearings and preservation of the
public good. [L 1969, c 211, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next